Utah statutes.
26-4-11.   Records and reports of investigations.

A complete copy of all written records and reports of investigations and facts resulting from medical care treatment, autopsies conducted by any person on the body of the deceased who died in any manner listed in Section 26-4-7 and the written reports of any investigative agency making inquiry into the incident shall be promptly made and filed with the medical examiner. Failure to submit reports other than reports of a county attorney, district attorney, or law enforcement agency, upon written request from the medical examiner within 10 days is a class B misdemeanor.



Amended by Chapter 38, 1993 General Session

